New Jersey, session 222, A4588.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  For purposes of this section, qualifying resident means a senior citizen or a person with a disability which hinders or limits mobility. b.  The owner of a multiple dwelling with three or more floors that is not held in a cooperative form of ownership shall grant priority status to a qualifying resident who is seeking to move into a unit with the same number of bedrooms located on a lower floor within the multiple dwelling.  A qualifying resident shall be granted the right of first refusal over applicants seeking to move into the multiple dwelling and over other non-qualifying residents of the multiple dwelling seeking to move into a unit on a lower floor.  The requirements of this subsection shall not displace any existing affordability requirements, targeting requirements, and income restrictions in place for the multiple dwelling. c.  The owner, or an agent thereof, shall post, in the same location and manner as a certificate of registration pursuant to subsection a. of section 12 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-12), a sign that contains information regarding the priority status granted to qualifying residents. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.